Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3111
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Health and Human Services Act are to (1) provide for the administration of publicly funded health and human services programs and services in the State of Nebraska through the Department of Health and Human Services; (2) transfer programs, services, and duties of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure, and the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support to a single state agency to be known as the Department of Health and Human Services; (3) create six divisions within the Department of Health and Human Services; (4) require the appointment by the Governor of a single chief executive officer for the department, a director for each of the six divisions of the department, and a chief medical officer; and (5) clarify the department's core missions, scope, functions, and responsibilities; ensure and improve accountability, collaboration, and coordination; and enhance services provided to Nebraskans by the department.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 2.